Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3347.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2889, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2889. A. Homesteads, as defined in Section 2888 of
this title, are hereby classified for the purpose of taxation as
provided in Section 22 of Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution.
All Expect as otherwise provided by this section, all homesteads in
this state shall be assessed for taxation the same as other real
property therein, except that each homestead, as defined by Section
2801 et seq. of this title, shall be exempted from all forms of ad
valorem taxation to the extent of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00)
of the assessed valuation.
Req. No. 15746 Page 1

B. Pursuant to the authority of Article XII-A of the Oklahoma
Constitution, all homeowners who are age sixty-five (65) and older
shall be exempted from all forms of ad valorem taxation on their
homestead.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective January 1, 2027.

60-2-15746 AO 01/05/26

















Req. No. 15746 Page 2